Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-2701.01
Income tax;
rate.

Pursuant to section 77-2715.01, for all taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 1990, and before January 1, 1991, under
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the rate of the income tax
levied pursuant to section 77-2715 shall be three and forty-three-hundredths
percent. Pursuant to section 77-2715.01, for all taxable years beginning or
deemed to begin on or after January 1, 1991, and before January 1, 2013, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the rate of the income tax levied pursuant
to section 77-2715 shall be three and seventy-hundredths percent. Pursuant to section 77-2715.01, for all
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2013, under
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the rates of the income tax
levied pursuant to section 77-2715 shall be as provided in section 77-2715.03.

Laws 1984, LB 892, § 1;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 35, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 539, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 773, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 32;

Laws 2012, LB970, § 2.